Louisiana, session 2026, HB774.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1038(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§§1038. Hearing aid coverage
* * *
C.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 22:1047 to the contrary, an
entity subject to this Section shall provide coverage for hearing aids for a child under
the age of eighteen an individual twenty-six years of age and under who is covered
under a policy or contract of insurance if the hearing aids are fitted and dispensed by
a licensed audiologist or licensed hearing aid specialist following medical clearance
by a physician licensed to practice medicine and an audiological evaluation
medically appropriate to the age of the child individual.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-354 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 774